Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 2. Public School Trust Fund.

Sec. 37.14.110.
Public school trust fund established.

There is established as a separate endowment trust fund the public school trust fund.

The principal of the fund established in (a) of this section consists of

the balance of the public school permanent fund on July 1, 1978; and

sums transferred under AS

37.14.150

.

[Repealed § 9 ch 80 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 21, 22 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, repealed (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Pre-existing dedications of revenue to funds such as the public school trust fund established by statute to satisfy trust obligations imposed by federal law are excluded from the reach of Alaska Const., art. IX, § 17. That section applies to proceeds net of dedications otherwise permitted under Alaska Const., art. IX, § 7, which permits dedications that are required for participation in a federal program. 1992 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 37.14.120.
Public School Fund Advisory Board created.

There is created in the Department of Revenue the Public School Fund Advisory Board composed of the commissioner of education and early development, three members elected by the Board of Education and Early Development from among its membership, and the commissioner of revenue.

The board created in (a) of this section shall elect a chairman from the membership of the board. Members serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards.

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, in (a) of this section, “Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 37.14.130.
Powers and duties of board.

The board created in AS

37.14.120

has the following powers and duties:

to hold regular meetings and special meetings considered necessary; and

to have prepared an annual accounting of the principal and income of the fund established in AS

37.14.110

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988)

Sec. 37.14.140.
Utilization of income.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 80 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 37.14.150.
Contributions.

During each fiscal year the commissioner of revenue shall transfer to the fund created in AS

37.14.110

a sum equal to one-half of one percent of the total receipts derived from the management of state land, including amounts paid to the state as proceeds of sale or annual rent of surface rights, mineral lease rentals, royalties, royalty sale proceeds, and federal mineral revenue-sharing payments or bonuses.

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Pre-existing dedications of revenue established by statute to satisfy trust obligations imposed by federal law are excluded from the reach of Alaska Const., art. IX, § 17. That section applies to proceeds net of dedications otherwise permitted under Alaska Const., art. IX, § 7, which permits dedications that are required for participation in a federal program. 1992 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 37.14.160.
Duties of the commissioner of revenue.

The commissioner of revenue is the treasurer of the trust fund created in
AS

37.14.110

and shall

in carrying out investment duties under this section, exercise the same powers and duties established for the Alaska Retirement Management Board in AS

37.10.220

;

deposit the principal and income from investments into the fund;

invest and maintain accounting records;

provide reports to the board established under AS

37.14.120

on the condition and investment performance of the fund;

determine, on July 1 of each year, the monthly average market value of the fund for the five fiscal years preceding the previous fiscal year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 29 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 24 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 65 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, in (2), substituted “into the fund” for “in separate principal and income accounts for the fund” at the end; in (3), deleted “that distinguish between the principal and income of the fund” at the end; added (5), and made a related change.

Sec. 37.14.165.
Use of the public school trust fund.

Each year, the legislature may appropriate not more than five percent of the amount determined by the commissioner of revenue under AS

37.14.160

(5) for the following purposes:

funding support of the state public school program; and

reimbursement of the costs of administration of the fund.

History.

(§ 5 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 10,
ch. 80, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 37.14.170.
Investments.

The commissioner of revenue is the fiduciary of the trust fund and shall invest the fund to provide increasing returns from capital appreciation and net income over long-term periods to the fund’s current beneficiaries. The commissioner may invest the money in the fund on the basis of probable total rate of return to promote the long-term generation of capital appreciation and income. In managing the trust fund, the commissioner shall

consider the status of the fund’s capital and the income generated on both a current and a probable future basis;

determine the appropriate investment objectives;

establish investment policies to achieve the objectives; and

act only in regard to the financial interests of the fund’s beneficiaries.

History.

(§ 4 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 30 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 25 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 80 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 8, 2018, in the introductory language, inserted “returns from capital appreciation and” following “provide increasing” and substituted “current beneficiaries” for “income beneficiaries” in the first sentence, in the second sentence inserted “capital appreciation and” following “long-term generation of”.